Wyoming statutes. Title 7 Criminal Procedure
Article 3. Sex Offender Registration
§ 7-19-303.
Offenders central registry; dissemination of information.

An entity registering an offender shall forward the information and fingerprints obtained pursuant to W.S.

7-19-302

to the division within three (3) working days. The division shall maintain a central registry of offenders required to register under W.S.

7-19-302

and shall adopt rules necessary to carry out the purposes of W.S. 7-19-302. The division shall immediately enter information received pursuant to this act into the central registry and shall immediately transmit the conviction data, palmprints and fingerprints to the federal bureau of investigation and national sex offender registry.

The information collected under this act shall be confidential, except for that information collected in accordance with paragraph (c)(iii) of this section which information shall be a matter of public record.

and (ii) Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 160, § 2.

The division shall provide notification of registration under this act, including all registration information, to the district attorney of the county where the registered offender is residing at the time of registration or to which the offender moves. In addition, the following shall apply:

Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 160, § 2.

If the offender was convicted of an offense specified in W.S. 7-19-302(h) or (j), notification shall be provided by mail, personally or by any other means reasonably calculated to ensure delivery of the notice to residential neighbors within at least seven hundred fifty (750) feet of the offender’s residence, organizations in the community, including schools, religious and youth organizations by the sheriff or his designee. In addition, notification regarding an offender employed by or attending school at any educational institution shall be provided upon request by the educational institution to a member of the institution’s campus community as defined by subsection (h) of this section;

Notification of registration under this act shall be provided to the public through a public registry, as well as to the persons and entities required by paragraph (ii) of this subsection. The division shall make the public registry available to the public, with the exception of internet identifiers, telephone numbers and adjudications as delinquent unless disclosure is authorized pursuant to W.S.

7-19-309

, through electronic internet technology and shall include:

The offender’s name, including any aliases;

Physical address;

Date and place of birth;

Date and place of conviction;

Crime for which convicted;

Photograph;

Physical characteristics including race, sex, height, weight, eye and hair color;

History of all criminal convictions subjecting an offender to the registration requirements of this act;

The license plate or registration number and a description of any vehicle owned or operated by the offender; and

The physical address of any employer that employs the offender; and

The physical address of each educational institution in this state at which the person is attending school.

The division shall adopt rules necessary to provide for the maintenance and dissemination of the information contained in the central registry of offenders.

and (e) Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 160, § 2.

The identity of the victim of an offense that requires registration under this act shall not be released to the public unless the victim has authorized the release of the information, provided:

Nothing in this subsection shall bar the disclosure of information concerning the characteristics of the victim and the nature and circumstances of the offense so long as the victim is not identified;

Nothing in this subsection shall bar the disclosure of victim identity information contained as part of the criminal history record information disclosed to persons authorized to receive such information under W.S.

7-19-106

; and

This subsection does not apply to victim identity information contained in public records which exist independently of this act.

Any person who, by virtue of employment or official position has possession of, or access to, registration information furnished pursuant to this act or victim identifying information, and willfully discloses it in any manner to any person or agency not entitled to receive the information is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both.

An educational institution in this state shall instruct members of its campus community, by direct advisement, publication or other means, that a member can obtain information regarding offenders employed by or attending school at the institution by contacting the campus police department or other law enforcement agency with jurisdiction over the institution. For the purposes of this subsection, “member of the campus community” means a person employed by or attending school at the educational institution at which the offender is employed or attending school, or a person’s parent or guardian if the person is a minor.

The attorney general shall maintain a public record of the number of registered offenders in each county.

The legislature directs the division to facilitate access to the information on the public registry available through electronic internet technology without the need to consider or assess the specific risk of reoffense with respect to any individual prior to his inclusion within the registry, and the division shall place a disclaimer on the division’s internet website indicating that:

No determination has been made that any individual included in the registry is currently dangerous;

Individuals included within the registry are included solely by virtue of their conviction record and state law; and

The main purpose of providing the information on the internet is to make the information more easily available and accessible, not to warn about any specific individual.

History.

Laws 1994, ch. 60, § 1; 1997, ch. 78, § 1; 1999, ch. 203, § 2; 2005, ch. 218, § 1; 2007, ch. 160, §§ 1, 2; 2009, ch. 162, § 1; 2011, ch. 179, § 1; 2016 ch. 13, § 2, effective July 1, 2016.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, updated an internal reference in (b)(ii); in (c), twice inserted provisions requiring a preponderance of evidence standard, and added the fourth and fifth sentences; in (c)(ii) added the last sentence; added (h), redesignating former (h) as (j); and made stylistic changes.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, repealed former (b)(i), (ii), (c)(i), (d) and (e) which pertained to requirements authorized to receive criminal history record information, low risk of reoffense and the courts' considerations and release of information.

Laws 2007, ch. 160, § 4, makes Section 3 of the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved July 1, 2007.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (a), inserted “palmprints” preceding “and fingerprints”; in (c)(ii), in the first sentence inserted “by mail, personally or by any other means reasonably calculated to ensure delivery of the notice” and added “by the sheriff or his designee” at the end, and in the second sentence inserted “by the educational institution”; and in (c)(iii)(H), inserted “subjecting an offender to the registration requirements of this act.”

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in the introductory clause of (c)(iii), inserted “with the exception of internet identifiers, telephone numbers and adjudications as delinquent”; in (c)(iii)(J), inserted “or registration”; added (c)(iii)(K) and (c)(iii)(M); and made related changes.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, in (c)(iii), added “unless disclosure is authorized pursuant to
W.S.

7-19-309

” following “delinquent.”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i), subparagraph (c)(iii)(I), or subparagraph (c)(iii)(L) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Appropriations. —

Laws 2007, ch. 160, § 3, appropriates two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000.00) from the general fund to the attorney general for the period beginning with the effective date of this section and ending June 30, 2008. The funds appropriated under this section shall only be used to purchase computer equipment and software necessary to implement the registration and notification requirements under W.S.

7-19-301

through

7-19-307

.

Section 3 of this act is effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8, of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 1, 2007.

Statute Does Not Violate Due Process. —

Former Wyoming Sex Offender Registration Act did not violate Due Process because, inter alia, the statutory scheme provides the offender with notice and a right to be heard, with both sides participating in the evidentiary hearing. The offender's somewhat limited rights are adequately protected by a requirement that the State prove any classification by a preponderance of the evidence. In re JJF v. State, 2006 WY 41, 132 P.3d 170,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 2006).

Risk of re-offense. —

The State's evidence when considered under the mandatory factors of § 7-19-303(d) was insufficient even under a preponderance of the evidence standard for the district court to classify defendant as high risk, where the evidence presented by the State did not show that: (1) defendant's conduct was characterized by repetitive and compulsive behavior, (2) there were any psychological or psychiatric profiles to indicate a risk of recidivism, (3) defendant's recent behavior indicated a threat of re-offense, or (4) the defendant had made recent threats or expressions of intent to re-offend. Avery v. State (In re Avery), 2002 WY 87, 47 P.3d 973,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 92

(Wyo. 2002).

District court did not err in finding it was more probable than not that sexual offender would reoffend because the quantum of evidence necessary to convince a court to classify a sexual offender as a moderate risk of reoffense was not very high and, inter alia, he was convicted of having sexual intercourse with a fifteen-year-old girl, to whom he had supplied alcohol. His probationary sentence was revoked due to a subsequent cocaine offense, and he was not receiving any counseling besides periodic NA attendance. In re JJF v. State, 2006 WY 41, 132 P.3d 170,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 2006).

Weight To Be Given To Relevant Evidence. —

Evidence is relevant and material if it tends to prove or disprove any of the factors found in former Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 7-19-303(d). The weight to be given to the evidence is up to the trier of fact, and the statute does not suggest what weight to give to what factor. In re JJF v. State, 2006 WY 41, 132 P.3d 170,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 2006).

Cited in

Vaughn v. State, 2017 WY 29, 391 P.3d 1086,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 2017).

§ 7-19-304.
Termination of duty to register.

The duty to register under W.S.

7-19-302

shall begin on the date of sentencing and continue for the duration of the offender’s life, subject to the following:

An offender specified in W.S.

7-19-302

(g) or adjudicated as a delinquent for offenses specified in W.S. 7-19-302(j), who has been registered for at least ten (10) years, exclusive of periods of confinement and periods in which the offender was not registered as required by law, may petition the district court for the district in which the offender is registered to be relieved of the duty to continue to register if the offender has maintained a clean record as provided in subsection (d) of this section. Upon a showing that the offender has maintained a clean record as provided in subsection (d) of this section for ten (10) years, the district court may order the offender relieved of the duty to continue registration;

An offender specified in W.S. 7-19-302(h) who has been registered for at least twenty-five (25) years, exclusive of periods of confinement and periods in which the offender was not registered as required by law, may petition the district court for the district in which the offender is registered to be relieved of the duty to continue to register if the offender has maintained a clean record as provided in subsection (d) of this section. Upon a showing that the offender has maintained a clean record as provided in subsection (d) of this section for twenty-five (25) years, the district court may order the offender relieved of the duty to continue registration; and

and (B) Repealed by Laws 1999, ch. 203, § 3.

A petition filed under this subsection shall be served on the prosecuting attorney for the county in which the petition is filed. The court shall not grant a petition that was not served on the prosecuting attorney. The prosecuting attorney may file a responsive pleading within thirty (30) days after service of the petition.

Repealed by Laws 1999, ch. 203, § 3.

Nothing in W.S.

7-13-302

shall be construed as operating to relieve the offender of his duty to register pursuant to W.S.

7-19-302

.

An offender seeking a reduction in his registration period as provided in paragraph (a)(i) or (ii) of this section shall demonstrate to the court that he has maintained a clean record by:

Having no conviction of any offense for which imprisonment for more than one (1) year may be imposed;

Having no conviction of any sex offense;

Successfully completing any periods of supervised release, probation and parole; and

Successfully completing any sex offender treatment previously ordered by the trial court or by his probation or parole agent.

History.

Laws 1994, ch. 60, § 1; 1999, ch. 203, §§ 2, 3; 2007, ch. 160, § 1; 2009, ch. 162, § 1; 2011, ch. 179, § 1.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, rewrote (a) and added (d).

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (a)(i), in the second sentence, inserted “offender may petition the district court for the district in the which the offender is registered to reduce the” and deleted “may be reduced” preceding “by five (5) years”; added (a)(iii); and rewrote (d)(iv),
which read: “Successfully completing an appropriate sex offender treatment program certified by the state,” and made related changes

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, rewrote (a)(i), which formerly read: “For an offender specified in W.S. 7-19-302(g), the duty to register shall end fifteen (15) years after the offender was released from prison, placed on parole, supervised release or probation, provided the registration period shall be tolled for subsequent periods of confinement. The offender may petition the district court for the district in the which the offender is registered to reduce the period of registration under this paragraph by five (5) years if the offender maintains a clean record as provided in subsection (d) of this section”; in (a)(ii), inserted “and periods in which the offender was not registered as required by law” and “if the offender has maintained a clean record as provided in subsection (d) of this section” in the first sentence, and substituted “maintained a clean record as provided in subsection (d) of this section for twenty-five (25) years” for “had no further felony or misdemeanor convictions during the period of registration”; and in the introductory language of (d), substituted “An offender seeking a reduction in his registration period as provided in paragraph (a)(i) or (ii) of this section shall demonstrate to the court that he has maintained a clean record by” for “A registration period under subsection (a) of this section may be reduced if, after the duty to register arises, the offender specified in W.S. 7-19-302(g) maintains a clean record for ten (10) years by.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (b) of this section, see § 7-19-301(a)(xv).

Jurisdiction.—

Granting the State’s motion for relief under Wyo. R. Civ. P. 60(b)(1) was not an abuse of discretion as Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 7-19-304(a)(i) clearly limited persons who could petition for relief for offenses specified in Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 7-19-302(j) to persons who were adjudicated as delinquents of the offense, and petitioner was undeniably ineligible for relief from the reporting requirements under § 7-19-304(a)(i). Moreover, the decision to grant the State’s motion to vacate the judgment was an appropriate exercise of judicial discretion. Gunsch v. State, 2019 WY 79, 444 P.3d 1278,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 81

(Wyo. 2019).

Applicability. —

Potential sex offender registrant's duty to register was improperly terminated under a 10-year provision because he pled guilty to fourth degree sexual assault, which was akin to third degree sexual assault, an offense to which a 25-year termination provision applied; moreover, the state did not waive its right to appeal the termination decision by failing to attend two hearings.
Office of the AG, Division of
Criminal Investigation v. Thomason, 2008 WY 143, 197 P.3d 144,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 145

(Wyo. 2008).

Cited in

Vaughn v. State, 2017 WY 29, 391 P.3d 1086,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 2017).

§ 7-19-305.
Registration; duties of registering entities; notice to persons required to register.

The entity required to register an offender under W.S.

7-19-302

(c) shall provide written notification to the offender of the requirements of this act and shall receive and retain a signed acknowledgment of receipt. The entity shall forward all registration information to the division within three (3) working days after registering the offender. When registering an offender the registering entity shall:

Obtain the information required for the registration by W.S.

7-19-302

;

Inform the offender that if he changes residence address he shall give the new address to the sheriff in person within three (3) working days, or if he becomes transient through lack of residence, he shall report on a weekly basis to the sheriff in the county in which he is registered until he establishes another residence;

Inform the offender that if he changes residence to another state, he shall register the new address with the law enforcement agency with whom he last registered and shall also register with the designated law enforcement agency in the new state not later than three (3) working days after establishing residence in the new state;

Obtain, or arrange for another law enforcement agency to provide, fingerprints, DNA sample and a photograph of the offender if these have not already been obtained in connection with the offense that triggers the registration requirement;

Inform the offender that if he is employed or attends school in another state while continuing residence in this state he must register with the other state as a nonresident worker or nonresident student;

Inform the offender that in addition to any other registration requirements of this act, if the offender becomes employed by or attends school at any educational institution in this state, or if his status of employment or enrollment at any educational institution in this state as reported during his last registration changes in any manner, he shall register the change within three (3) working days of the change with the entity with whom he last registered.

The department or other agency assuming jurisdiction shall provide written notification to an offender convicted in another state of the registration requirements of W.S.

7-19-302

at the time the department or agency accepts supervision and has legal authority of the individual under the terms and conditions of the interstate compact agreement under W.S.

7-3-401

.

History.

Laws 1994, ch. 60, § 1; 1999, ch. 203, § 2; 2005, ch. 218, § 1; 2009, ch. 162, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, added the proviso in (a)(ii) pertaining to an offender who has not established a new residence within 10 days of leaving a previous residence or who has become transient; in (a)(v) deleted definitions for “employed” and “attends school”; and added (a)(vi).

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “three (3) working days” for “ten (10) days” in (a)(ii), (a)(iii) and (a)(vi); and in (a)(ii), substituted “the sheriff in person” for “to the division in writing” and deleted “has not established a new residence within ten (10) days of leaving his previous residence or” preceding “becomes transient.”

Am Jur 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity of statutes imposing residency restrictions on registered sex offenders. 25 A.L.R.6th 227.

§ 7-19-306.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1999, ch. 203, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to present provisions providing penalties for failure to register, see §

7-19-307

.

Editor's notes. —

The section, which derived from Laws 1994, ch. 60, § 1, provided the penalties for failure to register as a sex offender.

§ 7-19-307.
Penalties.

Failure to register, update any registration information or pay any fee required under subsection (r) of this section within the time required under W.S.

7-19-302

constitutes a per se violation of this act and is punishable as provided in this section. The division shall notify the appropriate authorities when it discovers that an offender fails to register, update any registration information or pay any fee required under subsection (r) of this section within the time required under W.S.

7-19-302

or when an offender absconds.

An arrest on charges of failure to register, service of an information or complaint for a violation of this act, or arraignment on charges for a violation of this act, constitutes actual notice of the duty to register. Any person charged with the crime of failure to register under this act who asserts as a defense the lack of notice of the duty to register shall register immediately following actual notice of the duty through arrest, service or arraignment. Failure to register as required under this subsection constitutes grounds for filing another charge of failing to register. Registering following arrest, service or arraignment on charges shall not relieve the offender from criminal liability for failure to register prior to the filing of the original charge.

A person who knowingly fails to register as required by W.S.

7-19-302

is guilty of a felony punishable by a fine of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), imprisonment for not more than five (5) years, or both.

A person convicted of a subsequent violation of knowingly failing to register as required by W.S.

7-19-302

is guilty of a felony punishable by a fine of one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), imprisonment for not more than ten (10) years, or both.

A person who willfully fails to pay fees required under W.S.

7-19-302

is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six (6) months, or both.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 203, § 1; 2000, ch. 48, § 1; 2005, ch. 218, § 1; 2007, ch. 13, § 2; ch. 160, § 1; 2009, ch. 162, § 1; 2011, ch. 179, § 1; 2017 ch. 144, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, inserted “or failure to provide information regarding any change in employment or enrollment status at any educational institution in this state as required by W.S. 7-19-302(j)” in (a).

The 2007 amendments. —

The first 2007 amendment, by ch. 13, § 2, effective July 1, 2007, in (c), substituted “felony” for “high misdemeanor,” substituted “one thousand dollars ($1,000.00)” for “seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00),” substituted “five (5) years” for “one (1) year”; and substituted “ten (10)” for “five (5)” in (d).

The second 2007 amendment, by ch. 160, § 1, effective July 1, 2007, in (a), substituted “through (j)” for “and (h)” and substituted “7-19-302(k)” for “7-19-302(j)”; in (c), substituted “felony” for “high misdemeanor,” substituted “one thousand dollars ($1,000.00)” for “seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00)” and substituted “five (5) years” for “one (1) year”; and substituted “ten (10” for “five (5)” in (d).

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (a), added “or update any registration information” and deleted the second sentence, which read: “Failure to report his address as required by W.S. 7-19-302(g) through (j), or failure to provide information regarding any change in employment or enrollment status at any educational institution in this state as required by W.S. 7-19-302(k), is punishable as provided in subsections (c) and (d) of this section.”

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (a), added the second sentence.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, in (a), inserted “or pay any fee required under subsection (r) of this section” twice, and deleted “subsections (c) and (d) of” following “as provided in; and added (e).

Prospective operation. —

Laws 1999, ch. 203, § 4, provides: “Nothing in this act requires an offender who was previously required to register in accordance with the provisions of W.S.

7-19-301

through

7-19-306

prior to the amendments made by this act to register if his duty to register was terminated by the granting of a petition by the court under W.S. 7-19-304(b).”

Constitutionality. —

Consecutive sentences. —

Constitutionality. —

In a case where defendant challenged his conviction for failure to register as a sex offender, the Wyoming Sex Offender Registration Act did not violate the ex post facto clauses of the federal or state constitutions because the effects of the Act did not negate the legislature's intent to impose a regulatory scheme as it bore a rational connection to the goal of public safety by providing for identification of individuals convicted of sex offenses, and by making that information available to law enforcement agencies and the general public; and its requirements constituted a reasonable method of achieving the goal of public safety. Kammerer v. State, 2014 WY 50, 322 P.3d 827,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 55

(Wyo. 2014).

Consecutive sentences. —

After the district court reimposed a suspended sentence of four to six years related to a failure to register as a sex offender charge, it then imposed, based upon a separate and subsequent charge of escape, a three to seven year sentence but suspended execution of the sentence in favor of probation, which was statutorily permitted; it was legal for the district court to order the probationary sentence for the escape charge to be served consecutively after completion of the reimposed sentence related to the sex offender registration violation. Askin v. State, 2013 WY 162, 314 P.3d 1182,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 167

(Wyo. 2013).

Applied in

Askin v. State, 2016 WY 9, 365 P.3d 784,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 2016).

Am Jur 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Admissibility of actuarial risk assessment testimony in proceeding to commit sex offender. 20 A.L.R.6th 607.

§ 7-19-308.
Harboring a sex offender; penalties; exceptions.

A person is guilty of the crime of harboring, assisting, concealing, or withholding information about, a sex offender, if the person has knowledge that a sex offender is required to register under W.S.

7-19-302

and the person:

Assists the sex offender in eluding a law enforcement agency that is seeking to question the sex offender about, or to arrest the sex offender for, his noncompliance with the requirements of W.S.

7-19-302

or any other law prohibiting a sexual offense, child abuse or kidnapping;

Withholds information, including but not limited to the location of the sex offender, from, or fails to notify, the law enforcement agency about the sex offender’s noncompliance with the requirements of W.S. 7-19-302 or any other law prohibiting a sexual offense, child abuse or kidnapping and commits an affirmative act in furtherance of paragraph (a)(i), (iii) or (iv) of this section;

Harbors, or attempts to harbor, or assists another person in harboring or attempting to harbor, the sex offender;

Conceals or attempts to conceal, or assists another person in concealing or attempting to conceal, the sex offender; or

Provides information to the law enforcement agency regarding the sex offender which the person knows to be false.

Subsection (a) of this section shall not apply if the sex offender is incarcerated in a local, state or federal detention or correctional facility, or is in the custody of a law enforcement agency.

A violation of subsection (a) of this section shall be a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both.

History.

Laws 2007, ch. 13, § 1; 2009, ch. 162, § 1.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (a), deleted “who” preceding “is required to register” and deleted “is not complying, or has not complied, with the requirements of W.S.

7-19-302

” preceding “and the person.”

Effective dates

Laws 2007, ch. 13, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2007.

§ 7-19-309.
Juvenile sex offenders; risk assessment; factors; reporting requirements.

A minor offender convicted or adjudicated as a delinquent as specified in W.S. 7-19-301(a)(iii), shall be subject to this section.

The division shall provide notification of registration under this section, including all registration information, to the district attorney of the county where the registered offender is residing at the time of registration or to which the offender moves. Upon receipt of notification, the district attorney shall file an application for hearing under this subsection if, based upon a review of the risk of reoffense factors specified in subsection (c) of this section, the review indicates that public safety requires that notification be provided to persons in addition to those authorized to receive criminal history record information under W.S.

7-19-106

. Upon application of the district attorney and following notice to the offender and an in-camera hearing, the district or juvenile court shall, based upon its finding as to the risk of reoffense by the offender, authorize the division, county sheriff, police chief or their designee to release information regarding the offender as follows:

If the risk of reoffense is low, notification shall be in accordance with the requirements of W.S.

7-19-106

to persons authorized to receive criminal history record information under W.S. 7-19-106;

If the risk of reoffense is moderate or high, notification shall be provided to residential neighbors within seven hundred fifty (750) feet of the offender’s residence, organizations in the community including schools, religious and youth organizations and to the persons authorized under paragraph (i) of this subsection, through means specified in the court’s order.

In determining an offender’s risk of reoffense under subsection (b) of this section, the court shall consider:

Conditions of release that minimize risk of reoffense, including whether the offender is under supervision through a program provided in title 14 or a juvenile service program, on probation or parole, receiving counseling, therapy or treatment or residing in a home situation that provides guidance and supervision;

Physical conditions that minimize the risk of reoffense;

Criminal history factors indicative of high risk of reoffense, including:

Whether the offender’s conduct was found to be characterized by repetitive and compulsive behavior;

The age of the victim of the sexual offense;

Whether psychological or psychiatric profiles indicate a risk of recidivism;

The offender’s response to treatment;

Recent behavior, including behavior while confined or while under supervision in the community as well as behavior in the community following service of sentence;

Recent threats against any person or expressions of intent to commit additional crimes;

Other criminal history factors, including:

The relationship between the offender and the victim;

The number, date and nature of any prior offenses or acts resulting in an adjudication of delinquency; and

Any other factors the court deems necessary and relevant.

To the extent any other provision of law conflicts with the disclosure requirements of this section, the provisions of this section shall govern.

History.

2016 ch. 13, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

Effective date. —

Laws 2016, ch. 13 § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2016.

§ 7-19-310.
Sex offender registration account; purposes.

There is created the sex offender registration account to be administered by the division. Any state registration or reporting fees collected pursuant to W.S.

7-19-302

shall be deposited into the account. Funds in the account shall be expended only upon appropriation by the legislature and shall not be transferred or expended for any purpose other than administering and enforcing the provisions of this act. Interest accruing to the account shall be retained in the account and shall be expended for the purposes provided in this section.

History.

2017 ch. 144, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2017, ch. 144, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2017.